voikko-fi/vvfst/poikkeavat-sukija.lexc
[Ln][Xp]neiti[X]nei:nei SukijaNeiti ;
[Ln][Xp]neiti[X]nei[Sg][Ny]den@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@:neiden@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@   Loppu ;
[Ln][Xp]neiti[X]nei[Sg][Nm]tten@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@:neitten@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@ Loppu ;
[Ln][Xp]neitsyt[X]neits:neitsy NimisanaKuollut_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]neitsyys[X]neitsyy:neitsey NimisanaKalleus_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X]nuorna[Bm]miesnä:nuornamiesnä NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]olympia[X]olympi:olymppi NimisanaKarahka_a ;
[Ln][Xp]olympiadi[X]olympiad:olympiaad NimisanaRisti_a ;
[Ln][Xp]olympialainen[X]olympialai@P.EI_YKS.ON@@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@:olymppialai@P.EI_YKS.ON@@P.LAINEN.ON@@C.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@C.VAIN_NIMISANA@ NimisanaNainen_a ;
[Ln][Xp]omatunto[X][Sp][Ny]omaa[Bm]tuntoa:omaatuntoo	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]oopiumi[X]oopium:ooppium NimisanaRisti_a ;
[Ln][Xp]oopiumi=unikko[X]oopiumi[Bm]unik:oopiumunik NimisanaLaatikko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]oopiumi=unikko[X]oopiumi[Bm]unik:ooppiumunik NimisanaLaatikko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]oopiumi=sota[X]oopiumi[Bm]so:oopiumso NimisanaJuhta_a ;
[Ln][Xp]oopiumi=sota[X]oopiumi[Bm]so:ooppiumso NimisanaJuhta_a ;
[Ln][Xp]ori[X]ori:ori   SukijaOri ;
[Ln][Xp]paikka[X]paik@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@:paek@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@ NimisanaHaka_a ;
[Ln][Xp]paneeli[X]paneel:panel NimisanaPaperi_a ;
[Ln][Xp]pitsa[X]pits:pizz NimisanaKala_a ;
[Ln][Xp]pizza[X]pizz:pits NimisanaKala_a ;
[Ln][Xp]poliisi[X]poliis:polis NimisanaPaperi_a ;
[Ln][Xp]posliini[X]posliin@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@:porsliin@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@ NimisanaPaperi_a ;
[Ln][Xp]prioriteetti[X]prioriteet:priooriteet NimisanaTatti_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puteli[X]putel:putell NimisanaPaperi_a ;
[Ln][Xp]päre[X]päre[Ses][Ny]nnä:pärennä NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]rakuuna[X]rakuun:rakun NimisanaPeruna_a ;
[Ln][Xp]ruoka[X]ru:ru   SukijaRuoka ;
[Ln][Xp]shakki[X]sak:shak NimisanaTakki_a 
[Ln][Xp]sampoo[X]sampo:samppo NimisanaTrikoo_a ;
[Ln][Xp]sampoo[X]shampo:shampo NimisanaTrikoo_a ;
[Ln][Xp]sampoo[X]shampo:shamppo NimisanaTrikoo_a ;
[Ln][Xp]sarake[X]sarak:sarek NimisanaTarvike_a ;
[Ln][Xp]saareke[X]saarek:sarek NimisanaTarvike_a ;
[Ln][Xp]seraiji[X]seraij:seralj NimisanaPaperi_a ;
[Ln][Xp]seralji[X]seralj:seraij NimisanaPaperi_a ;
[Ln][Xp]shampoo[X]shampo:shamppo NimisanaTrikoo_a ;
[Ln][Xp]sihteeri[X]sihteer:sihtier NimisanaPaperi_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]sosiaali=demo=kraatti[X]sosiaali[Bm]demo[Bm]kraat:sosialidemokraat NimisanaTatti_a ;
[Ln][Xp]sosiaali=demo=kraatti[X]sosiaali[Bm]demo[Bm]krat:sosialidemokrat NimisanaRisti_a ;
[Ln][Xp]sosiaali=demo=kratia[X]sosiaali[Bm]demo[Bm]krati:sosialidemokrati NimisanaApila_a ;
[Ln][Xp]stationaarisuus[X]stationaarisuu:stationaarisyy NimisanaKalleus_aä ;
[Ln][Xp]stationaarisuus[X]stationaarisuu:stationäärisyy NimisanaKalleus_aä ;
[Ln][Xp]suksi[X]su[Sg][Nm]st:sust NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]sydän[X]sydäm:sydämm NimisanaUistin_m_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]sävel[X]sävel:sävel NimisanaAskel_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]teoria[X]teori:teoori NimisanaKarahka_a ;
[Ln][Xp]tirehtööri[X]tirehtor:tirehtor NimisanaRisti_a ;
[Ln][Xp]uksi[X]u@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@:u@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaUksi ;
[Ln][Xp]uskalikkous[X]uskalikkou:uskalikkuu NimisanaKalleus_a ;
[Ln][Xp]uskalikkuus[X]uskalikkuu:uskalikkuu NimisanaKalleus_a ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sn][Ny]uskottu[Bm]mies:uskottumies	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sn][Ny]uskotun[Bm]miehe:uskotunnmiehe       Omistusliite_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sg][Ny]uskotun[Bm]miehen:uskotunmiehen	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sp][Ny]uskottua[Bm]miestä:uskottuamiestä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Ses][Ny]uskottuna[Bm]miehenä:uskottunamiehenä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Str][Ny]uskotuksi[Bm]mieheksi:uskotuksimieheksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sine][Ny]uskotussa[Bm]miehessä:uskotussamiehessä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sela][Ny]uskotusta[Bm]miehestä:uskotustamiehestä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sill][Ny]uskottuun[Bm]miehee:uskottuunmiehee	NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sade][Ny]uskotulla[Bm]miehellä:uskotullamiehellä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sabl][Ny]uskotulta[Bm]mieheltä:uskotultamieheltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sall][Ny]uskotulle[Bm]miehelle:uskotullemiehelle	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sab][Ny]uskotutta[Bm]miehettä:uskotuttamiehettä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sn][Nm]uskotut[Bm]miehet:uskotutmiehet		Liitesana_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sn][Nm]uskotut[Bm]miehe:uskotutmiehe		Omistusliite_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sg][Nm]uskotuiden[Bm]miehi:uskotuidenmiehi		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sg][Nm]uskotuitten[Bm]miehi:uskotuittenmiehi	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sg][Nm]uskotuiden[Bm]miest:uskotuidenmiest		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sg][Nm]uskotuitten[Bm]miest:uskotuittenmiest	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sg][Nm]uskottujen[Bm]miest:uskottujenmiest		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sp][Nm]uskotuita[Bm]miehiä:uskotuitamiehiä		NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Ses][Nm]uskottuina[Bm]miehinä:uskottuinamiehinä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Str][Nm]uskotuiksi[Bm]miehiksi:uskotuiksimiehiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sine][Nm]uskotuissa[Bm]miehissä:uskotuissamiehissä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sela][Nm]uskotuista[Bm]miehistä:uskotuistamiehistä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sill][Nm]uskottuihin[Bm]miehii:uskottuihinmiehii	NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sade][Nm]uskotuilla[Bm]miehillä:uskotuillamiehillä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sabl][Nm]uskotuilta[Bm]miehiltä:uskotuiltamiehiltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sall][Nm]uskotuille[Bm]miehille:uskotuillemiehille	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sab][Nm]uskotuitta[Bm]miehittä:uskotuittamiehittä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sko][Nm]uskottuine[Bm]miehine:uskottuinemiehine	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uskottumies[X][Sin][Nm]uskotuin[Bm]miehin:uskotuinmiehin		Liitesana_ä;
[Ln][Xp]universiadi[X]universiad@P.EI_YKS.ON@:universiaad@P.EI_YKS.ON@ NimisanaRisti_a ;
[Ln][Xp]uros[X]uro:uro  SukijaUros ;
[Ln][Xp]uusivuosi[X][Ses][Ny]uunna[Bm]vuonna:uunnavuonna	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]uusivuosi[X][Ses][Ny]uunna[Bm]vuonna:uunna-vuonna	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]vartia[X]varti:varti NimisanaApila_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vartija[X]vartij:varti NimisanaApila_a ;
[Ln][Xp]venäjä[X]venä[Sp][Ny]ttä:venättä NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X]vierasna[Bm]miesnä:vierasnamiesnä NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X]vierasna[Bm]miesnä:vierasna-miesnä NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vinottais=pysäköinti[X]vinottais[Bm]pysäköin:vinottaispysäköin NimisanaTunti_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vuoka[X]vu:vu SukijaVuoka ;
[Ln][Xp]yhteen=sattuvaisuus[X]yhteen[Bm]sattuvaisuu:yhteensattuvaisuu NimisanaKalleus_a ;
[Ln][Xp]yhteen=sopivaisuus[X]yhteen[Bm]sopivaisuu:yhteensopivaisuu    NimisanaKalleus_a ;
!
[Ln][Xp]aasi=ori[X]aasi[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:aasior@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]hevos=ori[X]hevos[Bm]or:hevosor SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]isä=ori[X]isä[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:isäor@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]jalostus=ori[X]jalostus[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:jalostusor@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]johtaja=ori[X]johtaja[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:johtajaor@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]juoksija=ori[X]juoksija[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:juoksijaor@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]kanta=kirja=ori[X]kanta[Bm]kirja[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:kantakirjaor@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]kanta=ori[X]kanta[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:kantaor@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]kilpa=ori[X]kilpa[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:kilpaor@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]kruunun=ori[X]kruunun[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:kruununor@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]kruunun=ori[X]kruunun[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:ruununor@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]kulta=ori[X]kulta[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:kultaor@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;  ! Ei ole Joukahaisessa.
[Ln][Xp]ravuri=ori[X]ravuri[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:ravurior@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]siitos=ori[X]siitos[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:siitosor@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]sota=ori[X]sota[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:sotaor@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]täysi=veri=ori[X]täysi[Bm]veri[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:täysiverior@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
[Ln][Xp]valtion=ori[X]valtion[Bm]or@D.YS_ALKANUT@:valtionor@D.YS_ALKANUT@ SukijaOriYhdyssana ;
!
[Ln][Xp]ajo=asu=merkki[X]ajo[Bm]asu[Bm]merk@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@:ajoasumerk@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@ NimisanaTakki_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]juhla-=asu=liike[X]juhla-[Bm]asu[Bm]liik@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@:juhla-asuliik@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@ NimisanaTarvike_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kieli=asun=korjaus=malline[X]kieli[Bm]asun[Bm]korjaus[Bm]malline:kieliasunkorjausmalline NimisanaHame_a ;
[Ln][Xp]naamiais=asu=paska[X]naamiais[Bm]asu[Bm]@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@:naamiaisasupask@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@ NimisanaKala_a ;
[Ln][Xp]peli=asu=logo[X]peli[Bm]asu[Bm]logo:peliasulogo NimisanaHame_a ;
[Ln][Xp]peli=asu=malline[X]peli[Bm]asu[Bm]malline:peliasumalline NimisanaHame_a ;
[Ln][Xp]peli=asu=osio[X]peli[Bm]asu[Bm]osio:peliasuosio NimisanaAutio_a ;
[Ln][Xp]peli=asu=setti[X]peli[Bm]asu[Bm]set:peliasuset NimisanaTatti_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]peli=asu=sponsori[X]peli[Bm]asu[Bm]sponsor:peliasusponsor NimisanaPaperi_a ;
[Ln][Xp]peli=asu=tieto[X]peli[Bm]asu[Bm]tie@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@:peliasutie@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@ NimisanaLeuto_a ;
[Ln][Xp]peli=asu=väri[X]peli[Bm]asu[Bm]vär@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@:peliasuvär@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@ NimisanaRisti_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]pyöräily=asu=malline[X]pyöräily[Bm]asu[Bm]malline:pyöräilyasumalline NimisanaHame_a ;
[Ln][Xp]työ=asu=valmistaja[X]työ[Bm]asu[Bm]valmistaj:työasuvalmistaj NimisanaKoira_a ;
[Ln][Xp]uima-=asu=muoti[X]uima-[Bm]asu[Bm]muo:uima-asumuo NimisanaVati_a ;
[Ln][Xp]ulko=asu=ohje[X]ulko[Bm]asu[Bm]ohje:ulkoasuohje NimisanaHame_a ;
[Ln][Xp]ulkoilu=asu=merkki[X]ulkoilu[Bm]asu[Bm]merk@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@:ulkoiluasumerk@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@ NimisanaTakki_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]urheilu=asu=malline[X]urheilu[Bm]asu[Bm]malline:urheiluasumalline NimisanaHame_a ;
[Ln][Xp]urheilu=asu=tuote[X]urheilu[Bm]asu[Bm]tuot:urheiluasutuot NimisanaVaate_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vappu=asu=idea[X]vappu[Bm]asu[Bm]ide:vappuasuide NimisanaKarahka_a ;

LEXICON SukijaAsemosana
[Lr][Xp]he[X]he:he      SukijaAsemosanaMeTeHe ;
[Lr][Xp]hän[X]hä:hä     SukijaAsemosanaHän ;
[Lr][Xp]jompi[X]jom:jom	AsemosanaKumpi ;
[Lr][Xp]kumpi[X]kum:kum	SukijaAsemosanaKumpi ;
[Lr][Xp]me[X]me:me      SukijaAsemosanaMeTeHe ;
[Lr][Xp]mie[X]mi:mi     SukijaAsemosanaMieMä ;
[Lr][Xp]mikä[X]mi:mi	SukijaAsemosanaMikä ;
[Lr][Xp]minä[X]min:min  SukijaAsemosanaMinä ;
[Lr][Xp]moniahta[X]moniah:moniah AsemosanaPata_a;
[Lr][Xp]moniahta[X]moniah:monikah AsemosanaPata_a;
[Lr][Xp]monias[X]monia:monia AsemosanaVieras_a ;
[Lr][Xp]monias[X]moniaasti:moniaasti Liitesana_a ;
[Lr][Xp]mä[X]m:m        SukijaAsemosanaMieMä ;
[Lr][Xp]nämä[X]nä:nä    SukijaAsemosanaNämä ;
[Lr][Xp]sie[X]si:si     SukijaAsemosanaMieMä ;
[Lr][Xp]sinä[X]sin:sin  SukijaAsemosanaMinä ;
[Lr][Xp]sä[X]s:s        SukijaAsemosanaMieMä ;
[Lr][Xp]te[X]te:te      SukijaAsemosanaMeTeHe ;
[Lr][Xp]tämä[X]tä:tä    SukijaAsemosanaTämä ;
[Lr][Xp]mones[X]mone:mone JärjestyslukuKahdeksasOmistusliitteet_a ;
[Lr][Xp]muuan[X]muu[Sn][Ny]dan:muudan Liitesana_a ;
[Lr][Xp]muuan[X]muu[Ses][Ny]danna:muudanna Liitesana_a ;
[Lr][Xp]muuan[X]muu[Sp][Ny]datta:muudatta  Liitesana_a ;
[Lr][Xp]muuan[X]muu[Sp][Ny]danta:muudanta  Liitesana_a ;
[Lr][Xp]muutama[X]muutamasti:muutamasti    Liitesana_a ;
